Oklahoma, session 2025, SB831.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 2-101.9, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2-101.9. Members of the State Election Board shall be
paid Fifty Dollars ($50.00) Seventy-five Dollars ($75.00) per diem
for each meeting for the purpose of conducting hearings required by
law, and Thirty-five Dollars ($35.00) Seventy-five Dollars ($75.00)
per diem for other meetings, and shall be allowed mileage
reimbursement at the rate provided by the State Travel Reimbursement
Act, Section 500.1 et seq. of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 2-115, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2-115. The chair and vice-chair of each county election
board shall be paid Thirty-five Dollars ($35.00) Seventy-five
Dollars ($75.00) per diem in lieu of subsistence for each meeting of
the county election board and shall be allowed mileage reimbursement
at the rate prescribed for travel by state employees. The per diem

and mileage reimbursement shall be paid by the State Election Board,
except for meetings chargeable to other governmental units as
provided by law; provided, the State Election Board shall not pay
such reimbursement for more than forty meetings per fiscal year.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 831 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 24th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 30th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 831 Page 3